Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.010

Departments created.

There shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing, (8) the department of enterprise services, (9) the department of commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions, (16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the department of children, youth, and families, and (18) the Puget Sound partnership, which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the legislature may provide.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 109; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107; 2009 c 565 s 25; 2007 c 341 s 46; 2006 c 265 s 111; 2005 c 333 s 10. Prior: 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16; 1993 c 472 s 17; 1993 c 280 s 18; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 810; 1987 c 506 s 2; 1985 c 466 s 47; 1984 c 125 s 12; 1981 c 136 s 61; 1979 c 10 s 1; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 20; 1977 c 7 s 1; prior: 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 19; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 24; 1971 c 11 s 1; prior: 1970 ex.s. c 62 s 28; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 50; 1969 c 32 s 1; prior: 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 12; 1967 c 242 s 12; 1965 c 156 s 20; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.010; prior: 1957 c 215 s 19; 1955 c 285 s 2; 1953 c 174 s 1; prior: (i) 1937 c 111 s 1, part; RRS s 10760-2, part. (ii) 1935 c 176 s 1; 1933 c 3 s 1; 1929 c 115 s 1; 1921 c 7 s 2; RRS s 10760. (iii) 1945 c 267 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10459-1, part. (iv) 1947 c 114 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10786-10c.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2007 c 341: See RCW 90.71.907.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 2 ss 1-6, 8-59, and 61-79: See RCW 43.300.900.

Effective date—1993 c 472: See RCW 43.320.900.

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Legislative findings and intent—1987 c 506: See note following RCW 77.04.020.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 334: See note following RCW 46.01.011.

Federal requirements—1977 ex.s. c 151: See RCW 47.98.070.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105: See note following RCW 41.04.270.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.

Department of

agriculture: Chapter 43.23 RCW.

archaeology and historic preservation: Chapter 43.334 RCW.

children, youth, and families: Chapter 43.216 RCW.

commerce: Chapter 43.330 RCW.

corrections: Chapter 72.09 RCW.

ecology: Chapter 43.21A RCW.

employment security: Chapter 50.08 RCW.

enterprise services: Chapter 43.19 RCW.

financial institutions: Chapter 43.320 RCW.

fish and wildlife: Chapters 43.300 and 77.04 RCW.

health: Chapter 43.70 RCW.

labor and industries: Chapter 43.22 RCW.

licensing: Chapters 43.24 and 46.01 RCW.

natural resources: Chapter 43.30 RCW.

personnel: Chapter 41.06 RCW.

retirement systems: Chapter 41.50 RCW.

revenue: Chapter 82.01 RCW.

services for the blind: Chapter 74.18 RCW.

social and health services: Chapter 43.20A RCW.

transportation: Chapter 47.01 RCW.

veterans affairs: Chapter 43.60A RCW.